Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.305

Disclosure to nonresidents.

(1) An assisted living facility must provide each nonresident a disclosure statement upon admission and at the time that additional services are requested by a nonresident.

(2) The disclosure statement shall notify the nonresident that:

(a) The resident rights of chapter 70.129 RCW do not apply to nonresidents;

(b) Licensing requirements for *boarding homes under this chapter do not apply to nonresident units; and

(c) The jurisdiction of the long-term care ombuds does not apply to nonresidents and nonresident units.

[ 2013 c 23 s 10; 2011 c 366 s 4.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "boarding home" was changed to "assisted living facility" by 2012 c 10 s 2.

Findings—Purpose—Conflict with federal requirements—2011 c 366: See notes following RCW 18.20.020.